Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 8 Operation of Electric Membership Corporations Generally

46-3-340.
Nonprofit operation of electric membership corporations required; rates and fees to cover costs of operation and interest payments and for maintaining reserves; bylaw provisions concerning revenues, assets, and member classification.

Each electric membership corporation shall be operated without profit to its members; but the rates, fees, rents, or other charges for electric energy and any other facilities, supplies, equipment, or services furnished by the electric membership corporation shall be sufficient at all times:

To cover all administrative and operating expenses and the costs of purchased capacity and energy as necessary or desirable for the prudent conduct of its business, and to cover the payments of the principal of and interest on the obligations issued or assumed by the electric membership corporation in the performance of the purposes for which it was organized; and

To establish and maintain reasonable reserves.

An electric membership corporation may also accumulate funds for future capital needs and for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a reasonable capital structure.

The bylaws of an electric membership corporation shall contain provisions, consistent with subsection (a) of this Code section, for accounting for, allocating, assigning and disposing of its revenues and assets and may establish classes of members for such purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, §§ 12, 14; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 359, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Georgia Laws 1937, p. 644, contained two provisions which were designated as “Section 14,” one such provision appearing on page 653 and the other appearing on page 654. The provision appearing on page 653 is codified at this section and the provision appearing on page 654 is codified at §§

46-3-360

,

46-3-361

.

46-3-341.
Return of revenues upon death of member.

Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, upon the death of a member or former member who is a natural person, the board of directors shall have authority, but shall not be required, to pay revenues allocated but not previously paid to that member or former member.

If the member or former member dies testate, such payments shall be made to the person who is the executor of the estate of the decedent at the time of the payment.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the electric membership corporation is provided a copy of letters of administration for the estate of the decedent, such payments shall be made to the administrator of the estate named therein.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the electric membership corporation is not provided a copy of letters of administration of the estate of the deceased and such payment is $2,500.00 or less, such payment shall be made to the persons listed below and according to the priority indicated:

To the surviving spouse of the decedent;

If no surviving spouse, then to the surviving children of the decedent, pro rata;

If no surviving children, then to the surviving mother and father of the decedent, pro rata;

If no surviving parent, then to the surviving brothers and sisters of the decedent, pro rata.

If the member or former member dies intestate and the electric membership corporation is not provided a copy of the letters of administration and such payment is greater than $2,500.00, such payment shall be made to the person entitled thereto under the laws of descent and distribution of this state.

Payment to the persons listed in subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section shall operate as a complete acquittal and discharge to the electric membership corporation from any action, claim, or demand of whatever nature for the amount so paid by any heir, distributee, or creditor of the decedent or any other person. Payment to such persons is authorized to be made as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section without the administration of the estate of the decedent and without the necessity of obtaining an order that no administration is necessary.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 760, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.